Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,144
Schedule II controlled substance or other opiate; practitioner; duties.

(1) For purposes of this section, practitioner means a physician, a physician assistant, a dentist, a pharmacist, a podiatrist, an optometrist, a certified nurse midwife, a certified registered nurse anesthetist, and a nurse practitioner.

(2) When prescribing a controlled substance listed in Schedule II of section 28-405 or any other opiate as defined in section 28-401 not listed in Schedule II, prior to issuing the practitioner's initial prescription for a course of treatment for acute or chronic pain, a practitioner involved in the course of treatment as the primary prescribing practitioner or as a member of the patient's care team who is under the direct supervision or in consultation with the primary prescribing practitioner shall discuss with the patient, or the patient's parent or guardian if the patient is younger than eighteen years of age and is not emancipated, unless the discussion has already occurred with another member of the patient's care team within the previous sixty days:

(a) The risks of addiction and overdose associated with the controlled substance or opiate being prescribed, including, but not limited to:

(i) Controlled substances and opiates are highly addictive even when taken as prescribed;

(ii) There is a risk of developing a physical or psychological dependence on the controlled substance or opiate; and

(iii) Taking more controlled substances or opiates than prescribed, or mixing sedatives, benzodiazepines, or alcohol with controlled substances or opiates, can result in fatal respiratory depression;

(b) The reasons why the prescription is necessary; and

(c) Alternative treatments that may be available.

(3) This section does not apply to a prescription for a hospice patient or for a course of treatment for cancer or palliative care.

(4) This section terminates on January 1, 2029.

Laws 2018, LB931, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2018, § 28-473;

Laws 2019, LB556, § 2.